Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1552
Litter receptacle; abuse; misuse; prohibited; violation; penalty.

(1) No person shall damage, deface, abuse, or misuse any litter receptacle not owned by him or her so as to interfere with its proper function or to detract from its proper appearance.

(2) No person shall deposit leaves, clippings, prunings, garden refuse, or household waste materials in any litter receptacle, except with the permission of the owner of such receptacle.

(3) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 19;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 11.
September 30, 2030